src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-kaeaeqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kǟʼdõ: # Verb 5 'eng /est käia/fin' - full paradigm
     kǟʼdõ+V+Inf: [kǟʼdõ, kǟdõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ger: [kǟʼdsõ, kǟdsõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ger: [kǟʼdsõ, kǟdsõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup: [kǟʼmõ, kǟmõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Ine: [kǟʼmõõs, kǟmõõs]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Ela: [kǟʼmõõst, kǟmõõst]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Tra: [kǟʼmõõks, kǟmõõks]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Abe: [kǟʼmõõt, kǟmõõt]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [kǟʼb, kǟb]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [kǟʼtõ, kǟtõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kǟʼbõd, kǟbõd]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [keʼi, kei]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [keʼitõ, keitõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [keʼitõ, keitõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [kǟʼ, kǟ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [kǟʼks, kǟks]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [kǟʼ, kǟ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [kǟʼ, kǟ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [kǟʼgid, kǟgid]
     kǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [kǟʼgõ, kǟgõ]
     kǟʼdõ+V+QuoSg3: [kēʼji, kēji]
     kǟʼdõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [kǟʼnd, kǟnd]
     kǟʼdõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [kǟʼdõd, kǟdõd]
